Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

General Provisions

33-7-101. Examination of patients.

Any person with mental illness hospitalized under this chapter or held in a forensic services unit shall be examined as often as practicable but not less often than every three (3) months.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 27; T.C.A., § 33-714; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 37; 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 7, §§ 33-7-101 — 33-7-103, 33-7-201 — 33-7-203, 33-7-301 — 33-7-303 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 22, 26, 27; 1977, ch. 386, § 1; 1979, ch. 311, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 224, § 17; 1982, ch. 862, § 12; 1983, ch. 323, § 23; T.C.A., §§ 33-701, 33-704, 33-708, 33-709 33-711 — 33-715; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 35-38; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 26-28; 1987, ch. 143, § 4; 1998, ch. 978, §§ 1, 2), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

33-7-102. Credit toward sentence — Release.

Whenever a person is hospitalized or receives evaluation or treatment services under this chapter in connection with a criminal charge or conviction, wherever incarcerated, the person shall receive credit toward the satisfaction of the sentence for the time spent in the custody of the commissioner.

When a person has been transferred from the department of correction to the custody of the commissioner, the person shall be released from the custody of the commissioner at the expiration of the sentence unless a judicial hospitalization order has been entered with respect to the person.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-713; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 19.

33-7-103. Judicial hospitalization order as transfer of custody.

Without regard to its wording, any court order of hospitalization in a hospital or unit of a hospital shall be considered in law as a transfer of the person to the custody of the commissioner.

Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-715; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-7-104. Admissions to a state-owned or operated facility.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all admissions or transfers to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource under this chapter shall be subject to available suitable accommodations as defined in § 33-1-101, and no admission to a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource under this chapter shall occur until the commissioner has designated the state owned or operated facility as having available suitable accommodations; provided, that, if there are no suitable available accommodations at the time of the determination, then the commissioner shall expeditiously find a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource to accommodate the person upon the availability of suitable available accommodations. Prior to transporting a defendant for such evaluation and treatment in a department facility, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving facility has available suitable accommodations.

Acts 2009, ch. 531, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.